en: Grated carrots
de: Geriebene Karotten, geraspelte Karotten
es: Zanahorias ralladas
fi: raastetut porkkanat
fr: Carottes râpées
hr: Ribana mrkva
it: Carote grattugiate
ja: すりおろした人参
lt: Tarkuotos morkos
nl: Geraspte wortelen
pl: Tarta marchew
tr: Rendelenmiş havuç

en: Seasoned grated carrots, Seasoned shredded carrots
de: Gewürzte geriebene Karotten
fi: maustetut raastetut porkkanat
fr: Carottes râpées assaisonnées
hr: Začinjenu naribanu mrkvu
lt: Tarkuotos morkos su prieskoniais
nl: Aangemaakte geraspte wortels

en: Unseasoned grated carrots, Unseasoned shredded carrots
fr: Carottes râpées non assaisonnées
hr: Nezačinjenu ribanu mrkvu
lt: Tarkuotos morkos be prieskonių

en: Carrot salads
nl: Wortelsalades

en: Green beans wrapped in bacon
fr: Haricots verts enveloppés de bacon, Fagots de haricots verts enrobés de bacon

en: Celeriac in remoulade sauce
fr: Céleris Rémoulade, Céleri Rémoulade, Céleris Rémoulades
hr: Celer u remulade umaku
nl: Koolraapsalades

en: Greek-style marinated mushrooms, Greek mushroom
fr: Champignons à la grecque
hr: Marinirane gljive na grčki način
lt: Graikiškai marinuoti grybai, graikiški grybai
nl: Paddestoelen op griekse wijze

en: Baked beans in tomato sauce, baked beans
bg: Печен боб в доматен сос
de: Baked beans in Tomatensauce
fi: kypsennettyjä papuja tomaattikastikkeessa
fr: Haricots à la tomate, haricots à la sauce tomate, haricot à la tomate, haricot à la sauce tomate, haricot aux tomates, haricots aux tomates, haricots blancs à la tomate, haricots blancs aux tomates, haricots blancs à la sauce tomate, haricot blanc à la sauce tomate, haricots blanc aux tomates
hr: Zapečeni grah u umaku od rajčice
it: Fagioli cotti in salsa di pomodoro
lt: Keptos pupelės pomidorų padaže, keptos pupelės
nl: Bonen in tomatensaus, Witte bonen in tomatensaus
pt: Feijões cozinhados com molho de tomate

en: Barbunya
fr: Barbunya

en: Canned haricot beans with tomato sauce
fr: Haricots blancs à la sauce tomate en conserve, Haricots blancs à la sauce tomate appertisés

en: Canned Barbunya
fr: Barbunya en conserve

es: Alubias con verduras
fr: Haricots aux légumes

en: Refried beans
de: Gebratene Bohnen
es: Frijoles refritos
fr: Haricots refrits
hr: Preprženi grah

en: Ratatouille
de: Ratatouille
es: Ratatouille
fr: Ratatouilles, ratatouille, Ratatouille cuisinée
hr: Ratatouille
it: Ratatouille
ja: ラタトゥイユ
nl: Ratatouilles
ru: Рататуй

en: Prepared lentils
de: Fertiglinsen
es: Lentejas preparadas
fi: kypsennetyt linssit
fr: Lentilles préparées
hr: Pripremljena leća
it: Lenticchie pronte
lt: Paruošti lęšiai
nl: Kant-en-klaar linzen

en: Salt-cured pork belly with lentils
fr: Petits salés aux lentilles, petit salé aux lentilles, petit salé

en: Focaccia
bg: Фокача
fr: Focaccia
hr: Focaccia
ja: フォカッチャ
nl: Focaccias

en: Filled focaccia
fr: Focaccia garnie
hr: Punjena focaccia
it: Foccacia farcita
nl: Gevulde focaccias

en: Frozen focaccia
fr: Focaccia surgelée

en: Frozen langos
fr: Langòs surgelés